Florida, session 2026, HB1473.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (g) is added to subsection (2) of
section 943.03102, Florida Statutes, as created by HB 1471, 2026
Regular Session, to read:
943.03102 Designation of terrorist organizations.—
(g) Any portion of the information provided under this
subsection by the Chief of Domestic Security to the Governor and
Cabinet which would reveal information critical to state or
national security is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art.
I of the State Constitution. This paragraph is subject to the
Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15
and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and
saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1473 -03-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/CS/HB 1473, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
Section 2. (1) Section 943.03102, Florida Statutes,
requires the Chief of Domestic Security to provide written
notice and findings to the Governor and Cabinet before
designating an organization as a domestic terrorist organization
or a foreign terrorist organization. To allow the chief to
fulfill his or her role in making such a designation, the chief
must consult with local, state, and federal law enforcement
agencies; counter-terrorism organizations; and national security
organizations and receive national and domestic security
information that is highly sensitive in nature. For purposes of
public safety, the Legislature intends to keep such information
exempt from disclosure.
(2) The Legislature finds that it is a public necessity
that any portion of information contained in the chief's written
notice and findings provided to the Governor and Cabinet before
designating an organization as a domestic terrorist organization
or a foreign terrorist organization which would reveal
information critical to state or national security be made
exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1471 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1473 -03-er